Nevada, session 83, SB32.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 287.0426 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.0426 1. The Executive Officer may, within the limits of
legislative appropriations and other available money, appoint such
officers and employees as are necessary for the administration of the
Program, who are in the unclassified service of the State and serve
at the pleasure of the Executive Officer.
2. [The Director of the Department of Administration shall
appoint a Quality Control Officer for the Program. The Director
shall define the duties of the Quality Control Officer with the
concurrence of the Board. The Quality Control Officer is in
the unclassified service of the State and serves at the pleasure of the
Director.
3.] Each officer appointed pursuant to subsection 1 [or 2] who
is placed in charge of quality control, operations, finance or
information technology must be a graduate of a 4-year college or
university with a degree that is appropriate to their respective
responsibilities or possess equivalent experience.
[4.] 3. The Executive Officer may employ such staff in the
classified service of the State as are necessary for the performance
of the Executive Officer’s duties, within limits of legislative
appropriations or other available money.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB32*